District of Columbia statutes.
5-406

Appropriations for uniforms and other equipment.

For furnishing uniforms and all other official equipment prescribed by Department regulations as necessary and requisite in the performance of duty, there is hereby authorized to be appropriated a sum for each member of the Fire Department of the District of Columbia, to be expended subject to rules and regulations to be prescribed by the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

History

May 25, 1926, 44 Stat. 635, ch. 381
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-147, § 3, 55 DCR 2558

Cross References

Merit system, application to police officers and firefighters, see § 1-632.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-306.
1973 Ed., § 4-406.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-147 deleted “not exceeding $75 per annum” following “sum”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of FEMS Uniformed Members Labor Day Fundraising for Muscular Dystrophy Exemption Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-114, July 28, 2011, 58 DCR 6538).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.